Massachusetts, session 194th, S104.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 128 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 2E the following section:-
Section 2F. (a) The department of transitional assistance, in partnership with the
department of agricultural resources and the department of public health, shall operate a year-
round healthy incentives program. The program shall provide that Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program benefits, established pursuant to the Food and Nutrition Act of 2008, 7
U.S.C. section 2011 hereinafter referred to as SNAP, redeemed for fruit and vegetable purchases,
either fresh, canned, dried or frozen, by a SNAP recipient at a participating vendor, shall entitle
the recipient to receive a matching benefit reimbursed on the recipient’s EBT card, within limits
of 3

to be established by the department. When expanding the number of participating vendors, the
department shall prioritize improving access in areas with limited access to fresh, local produce
and that are historically underserved by the program. The department shall collaborate with local
food coalitions and nonprofit groups to develop community outreach strategies that ensure
equitable access to, and knowledge of, the program.
(b) There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a separate
fund, to be administered by the commissioner of the department of transitional assistance, which
shall be known as the Massachusetts Healthy Incentives Fund. The Fund shall consist of all
revenues from public and private sources as appropriations, gifts, grants, donations,
reimbursements from the federal government and grants-in-aid or other receipts to further the
purposes of the Fund in accordance with this section.
(c) The department of transitional assistance and its partners may apply for any available
federal programs such as Gus Schumacher Nutrition Incentive Program administered by the
United States department of agriculture to provide matching benefits to be deposited in the Fund.
(d) The department of transitional assistance shall, annually on or before January 31,
submit a report of the healthy incentives program’s activities to the clerks of the house and the
senate, the house and senate committees on ways and means, the committee on children, families
and persons with disabilities and the committee on agriculture and shall post the report on the
department’s website. The report shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the number of
households utilizing the program, including household size, age and racial demographic
information; (ii) the number of program transactions; (iii) the number and name of vendors
processing program transactions; (iv) a breakdown of the total number of program participants
of 3

and vendors, by their municipality; (v) the number of vendors, by their municipalities, who
applied to be a vendor with the healthy incentives program but were not accepted as a vendor
due to funding or administrative shortages; (vi) the department’s efforts, plans and timeline for
identifying geographic areas that are underserved by the program and increasing program
activity in those areas, including metrics and factors to be used to make determinations for the
addition and siting of vendors; and (vii) any further recommendations to improve the
performance of the program.
SECTION 2. The department of transitional assistance shall promulgate rules and
regulations to implement the program set forth in section 1.
of 3